Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.310

Warehouse receipts—Dealing in unauthorized receipts prohibited—Penalty.

Any person, or any agent or servant of that person, or any officer of a corporation who prints, binds, or delivers warehouse receipt forms, except on an order or requisition signed by the director, or who uses such forms knowing that they were not so printed, bound, or delivered is guilty of a class C felony and is punishable as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1983 c 305 s 44; 1963 c 124 s 31.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.